Maryland, session 2026, HB0807.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–121.
(a) A teacher preparation program shall:
(1) Include the following components of instruction:
(i) Basic research skills and methods and training on the routine
evaluation and use of research and data to improve student performance;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0807*

HOUSE BILL 807
(ii) Differentiation of instruction and demonstration of cultural
competence for students of diverse racial, ethnic, linguistic, and economic backgrounds with
different learning abilities;
(iii) Implementation of restorative approaches for student behaviors;
(iv) Identifying and assessing, in the context of the classroom, typical
student learning deficits and techniques to remedy learning deficits;
(v) Recognizing and effectively using high quality instructional
materials, including digital resources and computer technology;
(vi) Core academic subjects that teachers will be teaching;
(vii) Methods and techniques for identifying and addressing the social
and emotional needs of students, including trauma–informed approaches to pedagogy;
(viii) Skills and techniques for effective classroom management; [and]
(ix) Training in the skills and techniques for teaching effectively in a
virtual learning environment, including the use of online curriculum; AND
(X) TRAINING IN ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNER–RELATED
TEACHER COMPETENCIES, INCLUDING UNDERSTANDING LANGUAGE
DEVELOPMENT, EQUITABLE LITERACY LEARNING OPPORTUNITIES, AND WORKING
WITH LINGUISTICALLY DIVERSE STUDENTS AND FAMILIES, AND INCLUDING
ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNER–RELATED TEACHER COMPETENCIES IN OTHER
COURSES THROUGHOUT THE CURRICULUM;
(2) Require program participants to demonstrate competency in each of the
components required under item (1) of this subsection; [and]
(3) Provide training in the knowledge and skills required to understand
and teach the Maryland curriculum frameworks; AND
(4) BEGINNING IN THE 2028–2029 ACADEMIC YEAR, REQUIRE AT
LEAST ONE THREE–CREDIT COURSE IN TEACHING ENGLISH LANGUAGE LEARNERS.
(b) Each teacher preparation program shall incorporate classroom observations
in which the program participant is observed in different school settings at the beginning
of the teacher preparation program to assist a program participant in determining if the
program participant has the aptitude and temperament for teaching.
(c) A teacher preparation program shall develop a method for regularly
communicating and collaborating with local school systems, including, if necessary,

HOUSE BILL 807 3
through financial memoranda of understanding, to strengthen teacher preparation,
induction, and professional development programs.
(d) (1) An institution of higher education that offers graduate level courses in
school administration shall develop:
(i) A method for evaluating the potential of program participants to
be effective school leaders; and
(ii) A curriculum to enable school leaders to organize and manage
schools to achieve the effectiveness of top–performing schools or school systems, including:
1. Management of highly skilled professionals in a
professional work environment; and
2. Effective peer observations and effective evaluations of
other personnel.
(2) These courses shall include clinical experience and assessments to
determine whether participants demonstrate competency in these areas.
(e) An institution of higher education:
(1) May, if the institution of higher education shows cause, expand the total
number of credit hours required to graduate from an undergraduate teacher preparation
program by up to 12 credits; and
(2) May not require a number of credit hours in excess of 132 total credit
hours to graduate from an undergraduate teacher preparation program.
(f) To further support and strengthen the profession of teaching in the State, the
Department shall:
(1) Provide technical assistance and other supports to teacher preparation
programs at institutions of higher education in the State;
(2) Develop a systemic method of providing feedback to teacher preparation
programs to ensure that institutions of higher education have the most current information
about the content, composition, and expectations for teachers of prekindergarten through
12th grade classes;
(3) Assist teacher preparation programs in seeking and retaining highly
qualified individuals, including individuals from groups historically underrepresented in
the teaching profession;

HOUSE BILL 807
(4) In consultation with the Maryland Higher Education Commission,
establish specific goals for the recruitment and retention of teachers in teacher preparation
programs throughout the State; and
(5) Work with teacher preparation programs that fail to meet the goals
established under item (4) of this subsection to develop an action plan that demonstrates
how the teacher preparation program will meet the goals.
(g) The State Board and the Professional Standards and Teacher Education
Board shall, in consultation with the Accountability and Implementation Board established
under § 5–402 of this article, adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.